Utah statutes.
11-14-404.   Severability clause.

If any one or more sentences, clauses, phrases, provisions or sections of this chapter or the application thereof to any set of circumstances shall be held by final judgment of any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the remaining sentences, clauses, phrases, provisions and sections hereof and the application of this chapter to other sets of circumstances shall nevertheless continue to be valid and effective, the legislature hereby declaring that all provisions of this chapter are severable.

